Utah statutes.
32A-12-103 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Criminal responsibility for conduct of another.

In addition to Title 76, Chapter 2, Part 2, Criminal Responsibility for the Conduct of Another, the following principles apply to violations of this title:

(1)  If a violation of this title is committed by any person in the employ of the occupant of any premises in which the offense is committed, or by any person who is required by the occupant to be or remain in or upon the premises, or to act in any way for the occupant, the occupant is prima facie considered a party to the offense committed, and is liable as a principal offender, notwithstanding the fact that the offense was committed by a person who is not proved to have committed it under or by the direction of the occupant.  Nothing in this section relieves the person actually committing the offense from liability.

(2)  If a violation of this title is committed by a corporation, association, partnership, or limited liability company, the officer or agent of the corporation or association, partner, manager, or member of the limited liability company in charge of the premises in which the offense is committed is prima facie considered a party to the offense committed, and is personally liable to the penalties prescribed for the offense as a principal offender.  Nothing in this section relieves the corporation, association, partnership, or limited liability company, or the person who actually committed the offense from liability.

